Utah statutes.
48-1d-1035.   Statement of interest exchange.

(1)  A statement of interest exchange must be signed by a domestic acquired partnership and delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  A statement of interest exchange must contain:

(a)  the name of the acquired partnership;

(b)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the acquiring entity; and

(c)  a statement that the plan of interest exchange was approved by the acquired entity in accordance with Sections 48-1d-1031 through 48-1d-1036.

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (2), a statement of interest exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

(4)  A plan of interest exchange that is signed by a domestic acquired partnership and meets all the requirements of Subsection (2) may be delivered to the division for filing instead of a statement of interest exchange and on filing has the same effect.  If a plan of interest exchange is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this part to a statement of interest exchange refer to the plan of interest exchange filed under this Subsection (4).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

